Utah statutes.
58-31d-103.   Rulemaking authority -- Enabling provisions.

(1)  The division may adopt rules necessary to implement Section 58-31d-102.

(2)  As used in Article VIII (1) of the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact, "head of the licensing board" means the executive administrator of the Utah Board of Nursing.

(3)  For purposes of the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact, "APRN" as defined in Article II (1) of the compact includes an individual who is:

(a)  licensed to practice under Subsection 58-31b-301(2) as an advanced practice registered nurse; or

(b)  licensed to practice under Section 58-44a-301 as a certified nurse midwife.

(4)  An APRN practicing in this state under a multistate licensure privilege may only be granted prescriptive authority if that individual can document completion of graduate level course work in the following areas:

(a)  advanced health assessment;

(b)  pharmacotherapeutics; and

(c)  diagnosis and treatment.

(5) (a)  An APRN practicing in this state under a multistate privilege who seeks to obtain prescriptive authority must:

(i)  meet all the requirements of Subsection (4) and this Subsection (5); and

(ii)  be placed on a registry with the division.

(b)  To be placed on a registry under Subsection (5)(a)(ii), an APRN must:

(i)  submit a form prescribed by the division;

(ii)  pay a fee; and

(iii)  if prescribing a controlled substance:

(A)  obtain a controlled substance license as required under Section 58-37-6; and

(B)  if prescribing a Schedule II or III controlled substance, have a consultation and referral plan with a physician licensed in Utah as required under Subsection 58-31b-102(13)(c)(iii) or 58-44a-102(8)(b)(iii)(C).

